Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 236.6, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. A peace officer may file a petition under subsection 1 on behalf of a person if that person claims to be in present danger of domestic abuse and the person requests the peace officer to submit the petition. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 523, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor